North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-01.26.
Angel investor tax credit. [Effective for investments made after June 30, 2017]

For investments made after June 30, 2017, an angel investor is entitled to a credit against the income tax liability under section 57-38-30.3 for investments made by a certified angel fund into an in-state qualified business or an out-of-state qualified business. The credit is equal to thirty-five percent of the amount invested by the angel fund on behalf of the angel investor in an in-state qualified business during the taxable year and twenty-five percent of the amount invested by the angel fund on behalf of the angel investor in an out-of-state qualified business during the taxable year.

The aggregate amount of credits allowed to an angel investor in a taxable year is limited to forty-five thousand dollars. The aggregate amount of credits allowed to an angel investor for investments made in all taxable years is five hundred thousand dollars. The limitation under this subdivision does not apply to the angel fund but applies to each angel investor.

The credit must be claimed in the taxable year in which the investment is made in an in-state qualified business or an out-of-state qualified business. The credit allowed may not exceed the liability for tax under this chapter. If the amount of the credit determined under this section exceeds the liability for tax under this chapter, the excess may be carried forward to each of the five succeeding taxable years.

The investment used to calculate the credit under this section may not be used to calculate any other income tax deduction or credit allowed by law.

Angel investors may not receive more than five million dollars in aggregate credits under this section during the life of an angel fund but this provision may not be interpreted to limit additional investments in that angel fund.

Investments placed in escrow do not qualify for the credit.

A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of calculating the credit. The amount of the allowable credit must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The total credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity. An individual taxpayer may take the credit passed through under this section against the individual’s state income tax liability under section 57-38-30.3.

For purposes of this section:

“Early-stage entity” means an entity with annual revenues of up to two million dollars.

“In-state qualified business” means an early-stage or mid-stage private, nonpublicly traded enterprise that:

Is created, or its satellite operation is created, as a for-profit entity under the laws of this state.

Has its principal office in this state and has the majority of its business activity performed in this state, except sales activity, or has a significant operation in this state that has or is projected to have more than ten employees in this state.

Relies on research or the development of new products and processes in its plans for growth and profitability.

Is in compliance with state and federal securities laws.

Is not an entity or enterprise which is engaged in real estate development, is a real estate holding company, derives income from the selling or leasing of residential or commercial real estate, or carries on operations in the hotel, restaurant, convention, or hospitality industries, or makes any other similar use of real estate.

Is certified as an in-state qualified business that meets the requirements of this section by the department of commerce.

“Investment” means a cash investment in an in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business that is made in exchange for common stock, a partnership or membership interest, preferred stock, debt with a mandatory conversion to equity, or an equivalent ownership interest as determined by the tax commissioner.

“Mid-stage entity” means an entity with annual revenues over two million dollars not to exceed ten million dollars.

“Out-of-state qualified business” means an early-stage or mid-stage private, nonpublicly traded enterprise that:

Is created as a for-profit entity.

Relies on research or the development of new products and processes in its plans for growth and profitability.

Is in compliance with state and federal securities laws.

Is not an entity or enterprise engaged in real estate development, is a real estate holding company, derives income from the selling or leasing of residential or commercial real estate, or carries on operations in the hotel, restaurant, convention, or hospitality industries, or makes any other similar use of real estate.

Is certified as an out-of-state qualified business that meets the requirements of this section by the department of commerce.

An angel fund must:

Be a passthrough entity organized after June 30, 2017, as a domestic for-profit entity under the laws of this state, and have its headquarters in this state.

Not have invested, or intend on investing during its certification period, in real estate or real estate activities as described under subdivision e of subsection 2.

Consist of at least six accredited investors as defined in regulation D, rule 501 of the federal Securities Act of 1933.

Not have more than twenty-five percent of its capitalized investment assets owned by any one investor.

Have at least five hundred thousand dollars in commitments from accredited investors which are subject to call to be invested over an unspecified number of years to build a portfolio of investments in enterprises.

Be member-managed or a manager-managed limited liability company and the investor members or a designated board that includes investor members must make decisions as a group on which enterprises are worthy of investments.

Be certified as an angel fund that meets the requirements of this subsection by the department of commerce.

Be in, and remain in, compliance with state and federal securities laws, and invest only in in-state qualified businesses or an out-of-state qualified business that are issuing securities in compliance with state and federal securities laws.

On or before December 31, 2019, and every two calendar years thereafter, a minimum of fifty percent of an angel fund’s investments, as defined under subdivision c of subsection 2, must be invested into an in-state qualified business.

An angel fund shall hold the investment in an in-state qualified business or an out-of-state qualified business for at least three years from the date of investment. The three-year period does not apply if, before the end of the three-year period:

The investment becomes worthless;

Eighty percent or more of the assets of the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business are sold;

The in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business is sold;

The common stock of the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business begins trading on a public exchange; or

A partner, shareholder, or member of the angel fund dies, in which case the exception to the three-year holding period only applies to the deceased individual’s portion of the investment and related credit.

Within thirty days after the date on which an angel fund makes an investment in an in-state qualified business or an out-of-state qualified business, the angel fund shall report the investment to the tax commissioner on forms and in the manner prescribed by the tax commissioner. The report must contain:

The name, address, and federal employer identification number of the angel fund;

The total amount of the investment from all angel investors investing in the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business;

The name, address, and social security or federal identification number of each angel investor investing in the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business;

The amount invested by each angel investor in the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business;

The type of security received by the angel fund in exchange for the investment;

The name, address, and federal employer identification number of the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business;

The type of industry in which the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business is engaged; and

Any other information the tax commissioner determines is necessary for administration of this section.

An angel fund is subject to a penalty of one thousand dollars per month for each month, or fraction thereof, the report under subsection 6 is not filed. The tax commissioner, for good cause shown, may waive all or part of the penalty imposed under this subsection.

By January thirty-first of each year, the angel fund shall file with the tax commissioner a report showing:

The name and address of each in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business in which the angel fund has made an investment;

The principal place of business for each in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business reported under subdivision a;

The total amount invested in each in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business; and

Any other information the tax commissioner determines is necessary for administration of this section.

For an angel fund certified before July 1, 2017, within thirty days after the end of each calendar year, the angel fund shall file with the tax commissioner a report showing the name and principal place of business of each enterprise in which the angel fund has an investment and the amount of the investment.

Upon receipt of a written request from the chairman of the legislative management or the chairman of a standing committee of the legislative assembly, the tax commissioner shall disclose any information described under subsections 6, 8, and 9. This subsection does not authorize disclosure of the angel investor’s name, social security number or federal employer identification number, address, or any other information prohibited from disclosure under this chapter.

Angel investors may be actively involved in the in-state qualified businesses or out-of-state qualified businesses in which the angel fund invests but the angel fund may not invest in any in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business if any one angel investor owns directly or indirectly more than forty-nine percent of the ownership interests in the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business. The angel fund may not invest in an in-state qualified business or an out-of-state qualified business if any one angel investor is a partner, shareholder, or member of another passthrough entity that directly or indirectly owns more than forty-nine percent of the ownership interests in the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business.

Failure to comply with any provision of this section is cause to revoke the certification of an angel fund or an in-state qualified business or an out-of-state qualified business, or disallow the credit attributable to the noncompliance.

Notice of the revocation of the angel fund or an in-state qualified business’s or out-of-state qualified business’s certification must be provided to the angel fund or the in-state qualified business or out-of-state qualified business by the tax commissioner, department of commerce, or securities commissioner. Within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the angel fund shall provide a copy of the notice to each of its angel investors.

The angel fund’s investors shall file an amended return for each taxable year in which the disallowed credit reduced the investor’s income tax liability and pay the amount due. The amended return, if required, must be filed within ninety days after the date of the written notice given to the angel fund.

If the amended return is not timely filed, the tax commissioner shall disallow the credit and assess any tax due. An assessment of tax made under this subsection is final and irrevocably fixed.

If an amended return is filed as required under subdivision b, the tax commissioner has two years after the amended return is filed in which to audit and assess any tax due attributable to the revocation of the credit, even though other time periods for assessment under this chapter have expired. This subdivision does not limit or restrict any other time period for assessment under this chapter that has not expired.

An angel fund or a representative of the fund that knowingly makes, or causes to be made, any material false statement or representation in any application, report, or other document required to be filed under any provision of this section, or omits to state any material statement or fact in any such application, report, or other document required to be filed under any provision of this section, or fails to file the report required in subsection 8 or 9, and after thirty days’ notice to file is given by the tax commissioner, is subject to a penalty of ten thousand dollars.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the tax commissioner, securities commissioner, and the department of commerce may exchange any information obtained under this section to the extent necessary to administer this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 42; 2009, ch. 545, § 20; 2009, ch. 547, § 1; 2011, ch. 461, § 1; 2013, ch. 443, § 21; 2013, ch. 451, § 1; 2013, ch. 449, § 9; 2017 ch. 399, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2017 ch. 399, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

57-38-01.27.
Microbusiness income tax credit. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 519, § 1; 2009, ch. 545, § 21; 2013, ch. 443, § 22; Repealed by 2017, ch 389, § 3, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

57-38-01.28.
Marriage penalty credit. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

A married couple filing a joint return under section 57-38-30.3 is allowed a credit of not to exceed three hundred dollars per couple as determined under this section. The tax commissioner shall adjust the maximum amount of the credit under this subsection each taxable year at the time and rate adjustments are made to rate schedules under subdivision g of subsection 1 of section 57-38-30.3.

The credit under this section is the difference between the tax on the couple’s joint North Dakota taxable income under the rates and income levels in subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 57-38-30.3 and the sum of the tax under the rates and income levels of subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 57-38-30.3 on the qualified income of the lesser-earning spouse, and the tax under the rates and income levels of subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 57-38-30.3 on the couple’s joint North Dakota taxable income, minus the qualified income of the lesser-earning spouse.

For a nonresident or part-year resident, the credit under this section must be adjusted based on the percentage calculated under subdivision f of subsection 1 of section 57-38-30.3.

For purposes of this section:

“Qualifying income” means the sum of the following, to the extent included in North Dakota taxable income:

Earned income as defined in section 32(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Income received from a retirement pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or annuity plan.

“Qualifying income of the lesser-earning spouse” means the qualifying income of the spouse with the lesser amount of qualifying income for the taxable year minus the sum of:

The amount for one exemption under section 151(d) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

One-half of the amount of the standard deduction under section 63(c)(2)(A)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 520, § 5; 2011, ch. 459, § 5; 2019, ch. 486, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 564, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020.

57-38-01.29.
Homestead income tax credit — Rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 520, § 6; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2009, ch. 545, § 22; 2009, ch. 548, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 57, § 20, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 57-38-01.29 was repealed by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 20 of Chapter 57, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1043; Section 4 of Chapter 373, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2032.

57-38-01.30.
Commercial property income tax credit — Rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 520, § 7; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2009, ch. 545, § 23; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2017, ch. 57, § 20, effective August 1, 2017.

57-38-01.31.
Employer tax credit for salary and related retirement plan contributions for mobilized employees.

A taxpayer who is an employer in this state is entitled to a credit against tax liability as determined under sections 57-38-30 and 57-38-30.3 equal to twenty-five percent of the reduction in compensation that the taxpayer continues to pay during the taxable year to, or on behalf of, each employee of the taxpayer during the period that the employee is mobilized under title 10 of the United States Code as a member of a reserve or national guard component of the armed forces of the United States. The maximum credit allowed for each eligible employee is one thousand dollars. The amount of the tax credit may not exceed the amount of the taxpayer’s state tax liability for the tax year and an excess credit may be carried forward for up to five taxable years. For the purposes of this subsection:

“Reduction in compensation” means the amount by which the pay received during the taxable year by the employee for service under title 10 of the United States Code is less than the total amount of salary and related retirement plan contributions that would have been paid by the taxpayer to the employee for the same time period had the employee not been mobilized.

“Related retirement plan contributions” means the portion of voluntary or matching contributions paid by the taxpayer into a defined contribution plan maintained by the taxpayer for the employee.

A passthrough entity that is an employer in this state must be considered to be a taxpayer for purposes of this section. The amount of the credit determined at the passthrough entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 549, § 1; 2011, ch. 459, § 6; 2013, ch. 443, § 23.

57-38-01.32.
Housing incentive fund tax credit. [Expired]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 398, § 6; 2011 Sp., ch. 579, § 4; 2013, ch. 406, § 5; 2013, ch. 443, § 24; 2013, ch. 45, § 28; 2013, ch. 449, § 10; Expired by S.L. 2015, Ch. 14, § 20.

57-38-01.33.
Income tax credit for purchases of manufacturing machinery and equipment for the purpose of automating manufacturing processes. [Effective for the first three taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014]

A taxpayer that is a primary sector business is allowed a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 for purchases of manufacturing machinery and equipment for the purpose of automating manufacturing processes in this state. The amount of the credit under this section is twenty percent of the cost of the manufacturing machinery and equipment purchased in the taxable year. Qualified expenditures under this section may not be used in the calculation of any other income tax deduction or credit allowed under this chapter.

For purposes of this section:

“Manufacturing machinery and equipment for the purpose of automating manufacturing processes” means new or used automation and robotic equipment.

“Primary sector business” has the meaning provided in section 1-01-49.

“Purchase” includes manufacturing machinery and equipment acquired under a capital lease only for the taxable year in which the lease is executed. A capital lease is a lease which meets generally accepted accounting principles. The qualifying costs of the equipment acquired under a capital lease is the fair market value of the equipment at the inception of the lease.

The taxpayer shall claim the total credit amount for the taxable year in which the manufacturing machinery and equipment are purchased. The credit under this section may not exceed the taxpayer’s liability as determined under this chapter for any taxable year.

If the amount of the credit determined under this section exceeds the liability for tax under this chapter, the excess may be carried forward to each of the next five succeeding taxable years.

For the 2015 calendar year, the aggregate amount of credits allowed under this section may not exceed two million dollars. For the 2016 and 2017 calendar years, the aggregate amount of credits allowed each calendar year may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. However, if the maximum amount of allowed credits are not claimed in any calendar year, any remaining unclaimed credits may be carried forward and made available in the next succeeding calendar year. If the aggregate amount of credits claimed under this section exceeds the amount available in a calendar year, the tax commissioner shall prorate the credits among the claimants.

If a taxpayer entitled to the credit provided by this section is a member of a group of corporations filing a North Dakota consolidated tax return using the combined reporting method, the credit may be claimed against the aggregate North Dakota tax liability of all the corporations included in the North Dakota consolidated return.

A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of calculating the credit. The amount of the allowable credit must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The total credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity. An individual taxpayer may take the credit passed through under this subsection against the individual’s state income tax liability under section 57-38-30.3.

The department of commerce shall provide the tax commissioner the name, address, and federal identification number or social security number of the taxpayer approved as qualifying for the credit under this section, and a list of those items that were approved as a qualified expenditure by the department. The taxpayer claiming the credit shall file with the taxpayer’s return, on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner, the following information:

The name, address, and federal identification number or social security number of the taxpayer who made the purchase; and

An itemization of:

Each item of machinery or equipment purchased for automation;

The amount paid for each item of machinery or equipment if the amount paid for the machinery or equipment is being used as a basis for calculating the credit; and

The date on which payment for the purchase was made.

Notwithstanding the time limitations contained in section 57-38-38, this section does not prohibit the tax commissioner from conducting an examination of the credit claimed and assessing additional tax due under section 57-38-38.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 50, § 14; 2013, ch. 443, § 25; 2015, ch. 445, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2017, ch. 56, § 7, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

57-38-01.34.
Corporate credit for contributions to rural leadership North Dakota.

There is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by section 57-38-30 in an amount equal to fifty percent of the aggregate amount of contributions made by the taxpayer during the taxable year for tuition scholarships for participation in rural leadership North Dakota conducted through the North Dakota state university extension service. Contributions by a taxpayer may be earmarked for use by a designated recipient.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 451, § 2.

57-38-01.35.
Financial institutions — Net operating losses — Credit carryovers.

A subchapter S corporation that was a financial institution under chapter 57-35.3 may elect to be treated as a taxable corporation under chapter 57-38. If an election is made under this section, the election:

Must be made in the form and manner prescribed by the tax commissioner on the return filed for the tax year beginning on January 1, 2013, or the return filed for the short period required under subsection 8 of section 57-38-34; and

Is binding until the earlier of:

The end of the tax year for which the taxpayer reports a tax liability after tax credits; or

The beginning of the tax year for which the taxpayer elects to be recognized as a subchapter S corporation under section 57-38-01.4.

If an election is made under this section, the following apply:

A subchapter S corporation may not file a consolidated return.

Any unused credit carryovers earned by a financial institution under chapter 57-35.3 for tax years beginning before January 1, 2013, may be carried forward for the same number of years the financial institution would have been entitled under chapter 57-35.3.

Any unused net operating losses incurred by a financial institution under chapter 57-35.3 for tax years beginning before January 1, 2013, may be carried forward for the same number of years the financial institution would have been entitled under chapter 57-35.3.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 449, §
11.

57-38-01.36.
Twenty-first century manufacturing workforce incentive. [Effective for the first four taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018]

A taxpayer that is a primary sector business is allowed a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 for purchases of manufacturing machinery and equipment for the purpose of automating manufacturing processes in this state to improve job quality or increase productivity. The amount of the credit under this section is twenty percent of the cost of the manufacturing machinery and equipment purchased in the taxable year. Qualified expenditures under this section may not be used in the calculation of any other income tax deduction or credit allowed under this chapter.

For purposes of this section:

“Improved job quality” means a five percent increase in average wages or a five percent improvement in workplace safety as documented through participation in workforce safety and insurance safety incentive programs.

“Increased productivity” means no less than a five percent increase in output or a five percent increase in the number of units produced per automated line per time period.

“Manufacturing machinery and equipment for the purpose of automating manufacturing processes” means new or used automation and robotic equipment used to upgrade or advance a manufacturing process. The term does not include replacement automation and robotic equipment that does not upgrade or advance a manufacturing process.

“Primary sector business” has the meaning provided in section 1-01-49.

“Purchase” includes manufacturing machinery and equipment acquired under a capital lease only for the taxable year in which the lease is executed. A capital lease is a lease which meets generally accepted accounting principles. The qualifying costs of the equipment acquired under a capital lease is the fair market value of the equipment at the inception of the lease.

The taxpayer shall claim the total credit amount for the taxable year in which the manufacturing machinery and equipment are purchased. The credit under this section may not exceed the taxpayer’s liability as determined under this chapter for any taxable year.

If the amount of the credit determined under this section exceeds the liability for tax under this chapter, the excess may be carried forward to each of the next five succeeding taxable years.

The aggregate amount of credits allowed each calendar year under this section may not exceed one million dollars. However, if the maximum amount of allowed credits are not claimed in any calendar year, any remaining unclaimed credits may be carried forward and made available in the next succeeding calendar year. If the aggregate amount of credits claimed under this section exceeds the amount available in a calendar year, the tax commissioner shall prorate the credits among the claimants.

If a taxpayer entitled to the credit provided by this section is a member of a group of corporations filing a North Dakota consolidated tax return using the combined reporting method, the credit may be claimed against the aggregate North Dakota tax liability of all the corporations included in the North Dakota consolidated return.

A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of calculating the credit. The amount of the allowable credit must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The total credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity. An individual taxpayer may take the credit passed through under this subsection against the individual’s state income tax liability under section 57-38-30.3.

The department of commerce shall provide the tax commissioner the name, address, and federal identification number or social security number of the taxpayer approved as qualifying for the credit under this section, and a list of those items approved as a qualified expenditure by the department. The taxpayer claiming the credit shall file with the taxpayer’s return, on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner, the following information:

The name, address, and federal identification number or social security number of the taxpayer that made the purchase; and

An itemization of:

Each item of machinery or equipment purchased for automation, including a description of the equipment or system being upgraded or advanced, and an explanation of how the upgrade or advancement will improve job quality or increase productivity;

The amount paid for each item of machinery or equipment if the amount paid for the machinery or equipment is being used as a basis for calculating the credit; and

The date on which payment for the purchase was made.

Within one year after claiming a tax credit under this section, a taxpayer shall file with the tax commissioner a report that documents the improved job quality or increased productivity required under this section and any other information the tax commissioner determines is necessary for administration of this section. Failure to document the improved job quality or increased productivity requirements is cause to disallow the credit attributable to the noncompliance. The tax commissioner shall provide notice of the disallowed credit to the taxpayer. Within ninety days after the date of the notice, the taxpayer shall file an amended return for each taxable year in which the disallowed credit reduced the taxpayer’s tax liability and pay the amount due. If an amended return is not filed timely, the tax commissioner shall disallow the credit and assess any tax due. An assessment of tax made under this subsection is final and irrevocably fixed.

Notwithstanding the time limitations contained in section 57-38-38, this section does not prohibit the tax commissioner from conducting an examination of the credit claimed and assessing additional tax due under section 57-38-38.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 487, § 1, eff for the first four taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

57-38-01.37.
Individual income tax credit. [Effective for the first two taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

A resident of this state is entitled to a nonrefundable credit against the resident’s income tax liability as determined under section 57-38-30.3 for the taxable year. The maximum credit that may be claimed by a resident under this section for the taxable year is three hundred fifty dollars.The amount claimed may not exceed the amount of the resident’s income tax liability as determined under this chapter for the taxable year. Any credit amount exceeding a resident’s income tax liability for the taxable year may not be claimed as a carryback or carryforward.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 565, § 1, eff for the first two taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020.

57-38-02.
Annual tax on individuals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-03.
Imposition of tax against nonresidents.

The tax imposed by this chapter must be levied, collected, and paid annually upon and with respect to income derived from all property owned, from all gaming activity carried on in this state, and from every business, trade, profession, or occupation carried on in this state by natural persons not residents of the state at the rates specified with respect to net income of a resident of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 2346a3; S.L. 1929, ch. 239, § 1; 1931, ch. 283, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 57-3803; S.L. 1995, ch. 559, § 1.

57-38-04.
Allocation and apportionment of gross income of individuals.

The gross income of individuals must be allocated and apportioned as follows:

Income from personal or professional services performed in this state by individuals must be assigned to this state regardless of the residence of the recipients of such income, except that income from such services performed within this state by an individual who resides and has the individual’s place of abode in another state to which place of abode the individual customarily returns at least once a month must be excluded from the individual’s income for the purposes of this chapter if such income is subject to an income tax imposed by the state in which the individual resides, provided that the state in which the individual resides allows a similar exclusion for income received from similar services performed in that state by residents of North Dakota.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the compensation received from services performed within this state by an individual, who performs services for a common carrier engaged in interstate transportation and who resides and has the individual’s place of abode to which the individual customarily returns at least once a month in another state, must be excluded from income to the extent that the income is subject to an income tax imposed by the state of the individual’s residence; provided, that the state allows a similar exclusion of the compensation received by residents of North Dakota for similar services performed therein, or a credit against the tax imposed on the income of residents of this state that is substantially similar in effect. For purposes of this subdivision, the term an individual who performs services for a common carrier engaged in interstate transportation is limited to an individual who performs the services for a common carrier only during the course of making regular runs into North Dakota or from within North Dakota to outside North Dakota, or both, on the transportation system of the common carrier.

Income received from personal or professional services performed by residents of this state, regardless of where such services are performed, and income received by residents of this state from intangible personal property must be assigned to this state.

Income and gains received from tangible property not employed in the business and from tangible property employed in the business of the taxpayer, if such business consists principally of the holding of such property and collection of income and gains therefrom, must be assigned to this state without regard to the residence of the recipient if such property has a situs within this state.

Income derived from business activity carried on by an individual as a sole proprietorship, or through a partnership, subchapter S corporation, or other passthrough entity, must be assigned to this state without regard to the residence of the individual if the business activity is conducted wholly within this state. Income derived from gaming activity carried on in this state by an individual must be assigned to this state without regard to the residence of the individual.

Whenever business activity is carried on partly within and partly without this state by a nonresident of this state as a sole proprietorship, or through a partnership, subchapter S corporation, or other passthrough entity, the entire income therefrom must be allocated to this state and to other states, according to the provisions of chapter 57-38.1 but only according to the apportionment method provided under subsection 1 of section 57-38.1-09, providing for allocation and apportionment of income of corporations doing business within and without this state.

Income and gains received by a resident of this state from tangible property not employed in the business and from tangible property employed in the business of the taxpayer, if the business consists principally of the holding of the property and the collection of income and gains from the business, must be assigned to this state without regard to the situs of the property.

Income derived from business activity carried on by residents of this state, whether the business activity is conducted as a sole proprietorship, or through a partnership, subchapter S corporation, or other passthrough entity, must be assigned to this state without regard to where the business activity is conducted, and the provisions of chapter 57-38.1 do not apply. If the taxpayer believes the operation of this subdivision with respect to the taxpayer’s income is unjust, the taxpayer may petition the tax commissioner who may allow use of another method of reporting income, including separate accounting.

All other items of gross income must be assigned to the taxpayer’s domicile.

The privileges granted nonresidents apply only when other states grant to the residents of North Dakota the same privilege.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 2346a3; S.L. 1929, ch. 239, § 1; 1931, ch. 283, § 2; 1943, ch. 255, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-3804; S.L. 1947, ch. 338, § 1; 1957, ch. 360, §§ 1 to 8; 1957 Supp., § 57-3804; S.L. 1959, ch. 392, §§ 1, 2; 1961, ch. 360, §§ 1, 2; 1963, ch. 394, § 1; 1969, ch. 511, § 1; 1983, ch. 630, § 1; 1985, ch. 633, § 1; 1995, ch. 559, § 2; 1997, ch. 491, § 2; 2001, ch. 525, § 1; 2003, ch. 527, § 1; 2007, ch. 521, § 1; 2009, ch. 545, § 24; 2015, ch. 446, § 1.

Cross-References.

Uniform Division of Income Tax Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-38.1.

57-38-05.
Certain income of nonresidents not taxed.

Unless the income, gains, or both, arise from transactions in the regular course of the taxpayer’s trade or business carried on in this state, or unless the acquisition, management, and disposition of intangible personal property constitutes a trade or business carried on in this state, or unless the income, gains, or both, arise from gaming activity carried on in this state, income of nonresidents derived from land contracts, mortgages, stocks, bonds, or other intangible personal property, or from the sale of intangible personal property, may not be taxed.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 2346a3; S.L. 1929, ch. 239, § 1; 1931, ch. 283, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 57-3805; S.L. 1955, ch. 324, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 57-3805; S.L. 1991, ch. 672, § 2; 1995, ch. 559, § 3.